New York, session 2025-2026, S6524.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 362 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 362. Student mental health. 1. The university shall create and 4 administer, at the start of a student's freshman and junior year, a 5 mental health survey. Such survey shall include, but not be limited to, 6 questions regarding a student's mental health and general well-being. 7 Participation in such survey shall be optional to each student, and the 8 results of such survey from participating students shall be sent to the 9 chancellor of the university, appropriate staff including but not limit- 10 ed to the president of each state-operated institution of the universi- 11 ty, any oversight council as mandated pursuant to section three hundred 12 fifty-six of this article and any licensed mental health practitioners 13 employed by any of the state-operated institutions of the university. 14 2. There shall be a five member committee established within the 15 university that shall be responsible for engaging with and disseminating 16 mental health resources to faculty, staff and students. Such committee 17 shall be composed of a group of individuals chosen by the chancellor of 18 the university in conjunction with the presidents of each state-operated 19 institution of the university. Such committee shall also be responsible 20 for making recommendations to the regents of the university regarding 21 how often and in what manner faculty of the university shall provide 22 mental health wellness days and excused absences from class for 23 students. 24 3. All faculty and other staff of the university shall be required on 25 an annual basis to undergo mental health training with a focus on iden- 26 tifying or recognizing signs of mental distress among students. The 27 chancellor of the university, in conjunction with the commissioner, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11022-01-5 S. 6524 2 1 shall prescribe the form and manner in which such training shall be 2 provided. 3 4. The university shall also take the following actions regarding 4 student mental health: 5 (a) review enrollment and re-enrollment policies of the university and 6 create specific provisions for students that may require extended mental 7 health leave; 8 (b) create opportunities for telehealth and virtual counseling 9 options; 10 (c) require a mental health seminar to be included in all orientation 11 programs for newly enrolled students; and 12 (d) institute other programs to address and improve student mental 13 health. 14 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 15 as follows: 16 § 6235. Student mental health. 1. The city university shall create and 17 administer, at the start of a student's freshman and junior year a 18 mental health survey. Such survey shall include, but not be limited to, 19 questions regarding a student's mental health and general well-being. 20 Participation in such survey shall be optional to each student, and the 21 results of such survey from participating students shall be sent to the 22 chancellor of the city university, appropriate staff including but not 23 limited to the president of each senior and community college of the 24 city university, any oversight council of the city university and any 25 licensed mental health practitioners employed by any of the senior or 26 community colleges within the city university. 27 2. There shall be a five member committee established within the city 28 university that shall be responsible for engaging with and disseminating 29 mental health resources to faculty, staff and students. Such committee 30 shall be composed of a group of individuals chosen by the chancellor of 31 the city university in conjunction with the presidents of each city-op- 32 erated institution of the university. Such committee shall also be 33 responsible for making recommendations to the board of trustees regard- 34 ing how often and in what manner faculty of the city university shall 35 provide mental health wellness days and excused absences from class for 36 students. 37 3. All faculty and other staff of the city university shall be 38 required on an annual basis to undergo mental health training with a 39 focus on identifying or recognizing signs of mental distress among 40 students. The chancellor of the city university, in conjunction with the 41 commissioner, shall prescribe the form and manner in which such training 42 shall be provided. 43 4. The city university shall also take the following actions regarding 44 student mental health: 45 (a) review enrollment and re-enrollment policies of the city universi- 46 ty and create specific provisions for students that may require extended 47 mental health leave; 48 (b) create opportunities for telehealth and virtual counseling 49 options; 50 (c) require a mental health seminar to be included in all orientation 51 programs for newly enrolled students; and 52 (d) institute other programs to address and improve student mental 53 health. 54 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.